Hawaii statutes.
§291C-105 Excessive speeding. (a) No
person shall drive a motor vehicle at a speed exceeding:

(1) The applicable state or county speed limit by
thirty miles per hour or more; or

(2) Eighty miles per hour or more irrespective of the
applicable state or county speed limit.

(b) For the purposes of this section,
"the applicable state or county speed limit" means:

(1) The maximum speed limit established by county
ordinance;

(2) The maximum speed limit established by official
signs placed by the director of transportation on highways under the director's
jurisdiction; or

(3) The maximum speed limit established pursuant to
section 291C-104 by the director of transportation or the counties for school
zones and construction areas in their respective jurisdictions.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and shall be sentenced as follows without the
possibility of probation or suspension of sentence:

(1) For a first offense not preceded by a prior
conviction for an offense under this section in the preceding five years:

(A) A fine of not less than $500 and not more
than $1,000;

(B) Thirty-day prompt suspension of license
and privilege to operate a vehicle during the suspension period, or the court
may impose, in lieu of the thirty-day prompt suspension of license, a minimum
fifteen-day prompt suspension of license with absolute prohibition from
operating a vehicle and, for the remainder of the thirty-day period, a
restriction on the license that allows the person to drive for limited work-related
purposes;

(C) Attendance in a course of instruction in
driver retraining;

(D) A surcharge of $25 to be deposited into
the neurotrauma special fund;

(E) May be charged a surcharge of up to $100
to be deposited into the trauma system special fund if the court so orders;

(F) An assessment for driver education
pursuant to section 286G-3; and

(G) Either one of the following:

(i) Thirty-six hours of community service work;
or

(ii) Not less than forty-eight hours and not
more than five days of imprisonment;

(2) For an offense that occurs within five years of a
prior conviction for an offense under this section, by:

(A) A fine of not less than $750 and not more
than $1,000;

(B) Prompt suspension of license and privilege
to operate a vehicle for a period of thirty days with an absolute prohibition
from operating a vehicle during the suspension period;

(C) Attendance in a course of instruction in
driver retraining;

(D) A surcharge of $25 to be deposited into the
neurotrauma special fund;

(E) May be charged a surcharge of up to $100
to be deposited into the trauma system special fund if the court so orders;

(F) An assessment for driver education
pursuant to section 286G-3; and

(G) Either one of the following:

(i) Not less than one hundred twenty hours of
community service work; or

(ii) Not less than five days but not more than
fourteen days of imprisonment of which at least forty-eight hours shall be
served consecutively; and

(3) For an offense that occurs within five years of
two prior convictions for offenses under this section, by:

(A) A fine of $1,000;

(B) Revocation of license and privilege to
operate a vehicle for a period of not less than ninety days but not more than
one year;

(C) Attendance in a course of instruction in
driver retraining;

(D) No fewer than ten days but no more than
thirty days of imprisonment of which at least forty-eight hours shall be served
consecutively;

(E) A surcharge of $25 to be deposited into
the neurotrauma special fund;

(F) May be charged a surcharge of up to $100
to be deposited into the trauma system special fund if the court so orders; and

(G) An assessment for driver education
pursuant to section 286G-3. [L 2006, c 129, §1; am L 2008, c 231, §16]

Case Notes

Where prosecution did not provide a sufficient foundation for
the admission of officer's testimony regarding the speed reading given by the
officer's laser gun, and no other evidence was admitted at trial indicating the
speed that defendant was driving defendant's motor vehicle, disregarding the
officer's testimony resulted in a record that was devoid of any evidence of the
speed that defendant was driving defendant's motor vehicle; as this material
element was not supported by substantial and admissible evidence, defendant's
conviction reversed. 121 H. 204, 216 P.3d 1227 (2009).

There was insufficient evidence in the record to sustain
defendant's conviction under this section for speeding excessively where, given
the relatively small margin of error of five miles per hour greater than the
threshold established, officer's testimony that officer's speedometer appeared
to have been operating normally throughout the previous year alone was
insufficient to establish beyond a reasonable doubt that the speedometer on
officer's police vehicle was accurate to within five miles per hour on the
night of the offense. 122 H. 354, 227 P.3d 520 (2010).

As the offense of driving at an excessive speed under
subsection (a) is not a strict liability offense and requires proof that the
defendant acted intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly, the requisite state of
mind must be charged in the offense; where the charge against defendant failed
to allege the requisite state of mind, judgment vacated and charge dismissed
without prejudice. 128 H. 314, 288 P.3d 788 (2012).

Charge of excessive speeding under subsection (a)(1) against
petitioner dismissed where the charge did not allege that petitioner acted
intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly, thus failing to allege the requisite
state of mind. A charge that fails to charge a requisite state of mind cannot
be construed reasonably to state an offense and thus the charge was dismissed
without prejudice because it violated due process. 130 H. 353, 311 P.3d 676 (2013).

As §291C-161(c) requires every person convicted under this
section to be sentenced in accordance with this section, trial court erred in
sentencing defendant to a six-month driver's license suspension under §286-125;
the plain language of this section required the sentencing court to impose the
list of sanctions as specific under subsection (c), including a thirty-day
license suspension for a first-time offender. 121 H. 117 (App.), 214 P.3d 1107
(2009).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next